Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-2009
County officers; suspension pending trial; vacancy; how filled.

When the accused is an officer of the court, and is suspended, the court may supply his place by appointment for the term.

R.S.1866, c. 45, § 9, p. 298;

R.S.1913, § 5706;

C.S.1922, § 5036;

C.S.1929, § 26-1709;

R.S.1943, § 23-2009.

"Suspended", as used in this section, is not synonymous with "removed", as used in first section of article. State ex rel. Dodson v. Meeker, 19 Neb. 444, 27 N.W. 427 (1886).